Arkansas, session 2025, HB1430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 9-15-219(a)(1)(A), concerning the
definition of "course of control" under the Domestic Abuse Act of 1991, is
amended to read as follows:
(A) "Course of control" means a pattern of behavior
between family or household members that in purpose or effect unreasonably
interferes with the free will and personal liberty of a person.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 9-15-219(a)(2)(B), concerning the
definition of "disturbing the peace" under the Domestic Abuse Act of 1991, is
amended to read as follows:
(B) "Disturbing the peace" includes without limitation:

(i) Exhibiting course of control;
(ii) Stalking;
(iii) Repeatedly threatening;
(iv) Criminal impersonation;
(v) Verbally or electronically harassing or
telephoning with the intent to harass;
*LJH132*
02/05/2025 11:53:03 AM LJH132

HB1430
(vi) Harassing through surveillance;
(vii) Destroying personal property; and
(viii) Criminal trespass.

































02/05/2025 11:53:03 AM LJH132